Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 6. Amendments to Vital Records.

§ 32.1-269.
Amending vital records; change of name; acknowledgment of paternity.

A vital record registered under this chapter, with the exception of a death certificate, may be amended only in accordance with this section and such regulations as may be adopted by the Board to protect the integrity and accuracy of such vital records. Such regulations shall specify the minimum evidence required for a change in any such vital record.

Except in the case of an amendment provided for in subsection D, a vital record that is amended under this section shall be marked “amended” and the date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment shall be endorsed on or made a part of the vital record. The Board shall prescribe by regulation the conditions under which omissions or errors on certificates, including designation of sex, may be corrected within one year after the date of the event without the certificate being marked amended. In a case of hermaphroditism or pseudo-hermaphroditism, the certificate of birth may be corrected at any time without being considered as amended upon presentation to the State Registrar of such medical evidence as the Board may require by regulation.

Every request for an amendment to a birth certificate shall be reviewed to determine whether the requested amendment can be made administratively in accordance with regulations of the Board or if a judicial order is required for such amendment. The Department shall make information about the process by which amendments to a birth certificate may be requested and reviewed pursuant to this subsection available to the public on its website. Such information shall include a standard form for requests for amendments to a birth certificate.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a court order changing the name of a person as listed in a vital record and upon request of such person or his parent, guardian, or legal representative or the registrant, the State Registrar shall amend such vital records to reflect the new name.

Upon written request of both parents and receipt of a sworn acknowledgment of paternity executed subsequent to the birth and signed by both parents of a child born out of wedlock, the State Registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show such paternity if paternity is not shown on the birth certificate. Upon request of the parents, the surname of the child shall be changed on the certificate to that of the father.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required by regulation to amend a vital record, the State Registrar finds reason to question the validity or sufficiency of the evidence, or the requested amendment requires a judicial order, the vital record shall not be amended and the State Registrar shall so notify the applicant in writing. Such notification shall also include notice to the applicant regarding his right to petition the court for an order in accordance with subsection G.

Any person aggrieved by the decision of the State Registrar to deny a request to amend a vital record may petition the circuit court of the county or city in which he resides or the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, Division I, for an order compelling the State Registrar to amend the vital record; an aggrieved applicant who was born in Virginia, but is currently residing out of State, may petition any circuit court in the Commonwealth for such an order. The State Registrar or his authorized representative may appear and testify in such proceeding.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-353.24; 1956, c. 259; 1960, c. 451; 1979, c. 711; 1983, c. 240; 1985, c. 86; 2016, c. 496; 2020, cc. 465, 466; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 237.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 496, in subsection A, inserted “with the exception of a death certificate” and substituted “section” for “article”; and in subsection F, substituted “the State Registrar” for “he.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 465 and 466 are identical, and deleted former subsection E, which read: “Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction indicating that the sex of an individual has been changed by medical procedure and upon request of such person, the State Registrar shall amend such person’s certificate of birth to show the change of sex and, if a certified copy of a court order changing the person’s name is submitted, to show a new name”; and redesignated former subsection F as subsection E.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 237, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subsection C; redesignated former subsection E as subsections F and G, by inserting “or the requested amendment requires a judicial order” and substituting “notify the applicant in writing” for “advise the applicant” in the first sentence and adding the second sentence in subsection F; and in subsection G, substituting “Any person aggrieved by the decision of the State Registrar to deny a request to amend a vital record” for “An aggrieved applicant.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1603 Petition to Change Name; No. 5-1604. Petition for Name Change — Adults Only.

§ 32.1-269.1.
Amending death certificates; change and correction of demographic information by affidavit or court order.

Notwithstanding §

32.1-276

, a death certificate registered under this chapter may be amended only in accordance with this section and such regulations as may be adopted by the Board to protect the integrity and accuracy of such death certificate. Such regulations shall specify the minimum evidence required for a change in any such death certificate.

A death certificate that is amended under this section shall be marked “amended,” and the date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment shall be endorsed on or made a part of the death certificate. The Board shall prescribe by regulation the conditions under which omissions or errors on death certificates may be corrected.

The State Registrar, upon receipt of an affidavit and supporting evidence testifying to corrected information on a death certificate within 45 days of the filing of a death certificate, shall amend such death certificate to reflect the new information and evidence.

The State Registrar, upon receipt of an affidavit and supporting evidence testifying to corrected information on a death certificate more than 45 days after the filing of a death certificate, including the correct spelling of the name of the deceased, the deceased’s parent or spouse, or the informant; the sex, age, race, date of birth, place of birth, citizenship, social security number, education, occupation or kind or type of business, military status, or date of death of the deceased; the place of residence of the deceased, if located within the Commonwealth; the name of the institution; the county, city, or town where the death occurred; or the street or place where the death occurred, shall amend such death certificate to reflect the new information and evidence.

For death certificate amendments received more than 45 days after the filing of a death certificate, other than the correction of information by the State Registrar pursuant to subsection d, the surviving spouse or immediate family, as defined by the regulations of the Board, of the deceased; attending funeral service licensee; or other reporting source may file a petition with the circuit court of the county or city in which the decedent resided as of the date of his death, or the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, requesting an order to amend a death certificate, along with an affidavit sworn to under oath that supports such request. A copy of the petition shall be served upon (i) the State Registrar pursuant to Chapter 8 (§

8.01-285

et seq.) of Title 8.01 and (ii) any person listed as an informant on the death certificate, unless such person provides an affidavit in support of such petition. The clerk shall submit such petition and any evidence received with the petition to the judge for entry of an order without the necessity of a hearing, unless the judge decides a hearing is necessary. The clerk shall transmit a certified copy of the court’s order to the State Registrar, who shall amend such death certificate in accordance with the order. The matters for which a petition may be filed include changing the name of the deceased, the deceased’s parent or spouse, or the informant; the marital status of the deceased; or the place of residence of the deceased, when the place of residence is outside the Commonwealth.

When an applicant, as defined by the regulations of the Board, does not submit the minimum documentation required by regulation to amend a death certificate or when the State Registrar finds reason to question the validity or sufficiency of the evidence, the death certificate shall not be amended and the State Registrar shall so advise the applicant. An aggrieved applicant may petition the circuit court of the county or city in which he resides, or the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, for an order compelling the State Registrar to amend the death certificate; an aggrieved applicant who is currently residing out of state may petition any circuit court in the Commonwealth for such an order. A copy of the petition shall be served upon (i) the State Registrar pursuant to Chapter 8 (§

8.01-285

et seq.) of Title 8.01 and (ii) any person listed as an informant on the death certificate, unless such person provides an affidavit in support of such petition. The clerk shall submit such petition and any evidence received with the petition to the judge for entry of an order without the necessity of a hearing, unless the judge decides a hearing is necessary. The State Registrar or his authorized representative may appear and testify in such proceeding. The clerk shall transmit a certified copy of the court’s order to the State Registrar, who shall amend such death certificate in accordance with the order.

History.

2016, c. 496; 2017, cc. 284, 285; 2022, cc. 116, 117.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 284 and 285 are identical, and deleted former subsection C, pertaining to amendment of death certificate in light of new evidence, added subsection D and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection C, inserted “The State Registrar” and “on a death certificate” and deleted “the State Registrar” following “where the death occurred” near the end; and in subsection E, inserted “as defined by the regulations of the Board” in the first sentence, added the third, fourth and sixth sentences.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 116 and 117 are identical, and added subsection C; inserted “more than 45 days after the filing of a death certificate” in subsection D; and in subsection E, inserted “received more than 45 days after the filing of a death certificate” and substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C”; and made a stylistic change.